tests/comp.lexd
PATTERNS
NounStem NounInfl
NounStem NounInflComp Comp NounStem2 NounInfl

LEXICON Comp
<comp>+:

LEXICON NounStem
#bloop
shoop
blarg

ALIAS NounStem NounStem2

LEXICON NounInfl
<n><sg>:
<n><pl>:ah

LEXICON NounInflComp
<n>:a
